Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-403 Formal testacy
proceedings; notice of hearing on petition. (a) Upon commencement of a
formal testacy proceeding, the court shall fix a time and place of hearing.
Notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by section 560:1-401 by the petitioner
to the persons herein enumerated and to any additional person who has filed a
demand for notice under section 560:3-204. The notice shall include the name
and address of the applicant, the name and location of the court hearing the
petition, and the date of the hearing.

(b) Notice shall be given to the following
persons: the surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, children, and other
heirs of the decedent, the devisees and executors named in any will that is
being, or has been, probated, or offered for informal or formal probate in the
judicial circuit or that is known by the petitioner to have been probated, or
offered for informal or formal probate elsewhere, and any personal
representative of the decedent whose appointment has not been terminated.
Notice may be given to other persons. In addition, the petitioner shall give
notice by publication to all unknown persons and to all known persons whose
addresses are unknown who have any interest in the matters being litigated.

(c) If it appears by the petition or otherwise
that the fact of the death of the alleged decedent may be in doubt, or on the
written demand of any interested person, a copy of the notice of the hearing on
the petition shall be sent by registered or certified mail to the alleged
decedent at the alleged decedent's last known address. The court shall direct
the petitioner to report the results of, or make and report back concerning, a
reasonably diligent search for the alleged decedent in any manner that may seem
advisable, including any or all of the following methods:

(1) By inserting in one or more suitable periodicals
a notice requesting information from any person having knowledge of the
whereabouts of the alleged decedent;

(2) By notifying law enforcement officials and public
welfare agencies in appropriate locations of the disappearance of the alleged
decedent; or

(3) By engaging the services of an investigator.

The costs of any search so directed shall be
paid by the petitioner if there is no administration or by the estate of the
decedent in case there is administration. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 1997,
c 383, §19]

Rules of Court

Notice, see Hawaii Probate Rules, part A(III); HPR
rule 51.

Determination of death, see Hawaii Probate Rules, part F.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next